Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-676
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act, the definitions found in section 46-706 are used.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 74;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 220;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 94;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 190.